Hawaii statutes.
PART II.
LARGE FISHING VESSEL PURCHASE, CONSTRUCTION,

RENOVATION,
MAINTENANCE, AND REPAIR LOAN PROGRAM

Note

Part heading amended by L 1975, c 167, §4; L 1976, c 70, §1.

§189-21 Definitions. As used in this
part:

"Department" means the department of
business, economic development, and tourism.

"Director" means the director of
business, economic development, and tourism.

"Large fishing vessel" means any
vessel five net tons and over designed to be used in the Hawaii commercial
fisheries for catching fish, processing, or transporting fish loaded on the
high seas that derives at least fifty-one per cent of that vessel's gross
annual income from commercial (as opposed to recreational) operations, or any
vessel outfitted for such activity.

"National Marine Fisheries Service"
means the Financial Assistance Division, National Marine Fisheries Service,
National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration, United States Department of
Commerce.

"SBA" means the Federal Small
Business Administration. [L 1965, c 193, §2; Supp, §21-101; HRS §189-21; am L
1975, c 167, pt of §4; am L 1976, c 70, pt of §1; am L 1987, c 336, §7; am L
1990, c 293, §8]

Note

"Financial Assistance Division", National Marine
Fisheries Service, now known as "Financial Services Division".

Revision Note

Numeric designations deleted and definitions rearranged.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next